Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1119
Rules and regulations.

The department and board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 74.